csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_s.yaml
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishisiiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: nimawadisigoosiiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigominaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigominaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: nimawadisigoominaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishisiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishisiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: nimawadisigoosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: nimawadisigoomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigosiiminaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigosiiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishisiiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishisiiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: nimawadisigoosiiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigominaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigominaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: nimawadisigoominaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigosiiminaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigosiiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: gimawadisigoosiiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigominaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigominaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: gimawadisigoominaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: gimawadisigoosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: gimawadisigoomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigosiiminaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigosiiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: gimawadisigoosiiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigominaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigominaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: gimawadisigoominaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigosiiwaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigosiiwegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigosiiwanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigosiiwaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigosiinigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigosiigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigosiiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigosiiwangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisisinowagoogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisisiinowaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawagwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawagen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawagen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishisiiwegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawegwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: mawadishisiiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishisiiwanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawadwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawaden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawaden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: mawadishisiiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishisiiwaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisigoosiiwegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisisiinowegwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasiwaawaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishisiiwangidwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisisiinowangwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigosiiwaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigosiigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishisiigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisigoosiiwanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisisiinowegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasiigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishisiiwangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisisiinowangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: mawadisisiinogwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: mawadisisiinogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawangidwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawangwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: mawadisigoosiiwaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: mawadisigoosiiwegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: mawadisigoosiiwanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawindwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawinden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawinden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: mawadisigoosiiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: mawadisigoosiiwangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigowaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigowegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigowanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigowaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigonigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigowaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigowangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisinagoogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisinowaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaawagwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawagen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaawagen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishiwegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisaawegwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadisaawegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: mawadishiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishiwanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaawadwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawaden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaawaden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: mawadishiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishiwaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisigoowegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisinowegwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaawaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishiwangidwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisinowangwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigowaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisigoowanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisinowegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishiwangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisinowangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: mawadisinogwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: mawadisinogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisaawangidwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisaawangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisaawangwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisaawangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: mawadisigoowaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: mawadisigoowegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: mawadisigoowanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: mawadisaawindwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawinden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: mawadisaawinden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: mawadisigoowaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: mawadisigoowangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigosiwaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigosiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigosiwan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigosigwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigosinig
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigosig
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigosiwaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigosiwang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisisinowagog
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisisinowaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwagwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwag
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwag
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishisiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwegwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiweg
